Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
CHAPTER 4A Provision of Energy Conservation Assistance
to Residential Customers by Electric
and Gas Utilities

Cross references.

Adoption and continuation of Georgia State Energy Code for Buildings, §

8-2-21

.

46-4A-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Residential Conservation Service Act of 1981.”

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1258, § 1.

46-4A-2.
Legislative findings; declaration of policy.

The General Assembly finds that the rising cost and uncertain supply of energy resources require an active program of energy conservation assistance, especially for the residential sector, which often has limited access to expert advice on energy conservation. In response to this need and to the mandate of the National Energy Conservation Policy Act, P.L. 95-619, the former Office of Energy Resources, now the Division of Energy Resources of the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority, on behalf of the Office of Planning and Budget, has developed the state plan for the Residential Conservation Service, which requires certain utilities to offer home energy audits and related services to residential customers. Further, the General Assembly finds that in order to ensure the implementation of the state plan for the Residential Conservation Service and avoid the imposition of the federal plan, adequate authority for state enforcement of the state plan must be instituted. Therefore, in order to provide Georgia’s regulated utilities and their customers with the most appropriate and flexible plan for carrying out the Residential Conservation Service, the General Assembly declares that the Office of Planning and Budget shall be authorized to promulgate regulations to establish the Residential Conservation Service and provide for its enforcement.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1258, § 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1108, § 3; Ga. L. 2010, p. 949, § 1/HB 244.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “Georgia Environmental Finance Authority” for “Georgia Environmental Facilities Authority” in the middle of the second sentence.

U.S. Code.

The federal National Energy Conservation Policy Act, referred to in this section, is codified principally at

42 U.S.C. § 8201

et seq.

46-4A-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Covered utility” means a utility which is regulated in rate-making matters by the commission and which in any calendar year had retail sales of natural gas in excess of 10 billion cubic feet or of electricity in excess of 750 million kilowatt hours during the second preceding calendar year.

“Director” means the director of the Office of Planning and Budget or his designee.

“Person” means any individual, corporation, partnership, association, state, municipality, or political subdivision of a state; any agency, department, or instrumentality of the United States; or any other entity, and includes any officer, agent, or employee of any of the above.

“Program” means the Residential Conservation Service program, established under the National Energy Conservation Policy Act (P.L. 95-619), as amended.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1258, § 3; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 46; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 46.

U.S. Code.

The federal National Energy Conservation Policy Act, referred to in paragraph (4) of this section, is codified principally at

42 U.S.C. § 8201

et seq.

46-4A-4.
Powers and duties of director generally.

The director shall have and may exercise the following powers and duties:

To adopt, modify, repeal, and promulgate, after consultation with all affected parties and due notice and public hearings held in accordance with and established pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” rules and regulations for the establishment and implementation of the Residential Conservation Service program. The initial proposed regulations shall be based upon the state plan for the Residential Conservation Service as approved by the United States Department of Energy and shall include provisions for:

Identification of covered utilities;

Utility responsibilities, such as:

Providing program information for customers;

Performance of on-site energy audits;

Arranging financing and installation;

Distribution of lists of contractors, suppliers, and lenders;

Conducting inspections of installed measures;

Determining qualifications of auditors and inspectors; and

Establishing record keeping, financial accounting, and reporting requirements;

Development and maintenance of master records of contractors, suppliers, and lenders;

Consumer complaint mechanisms;

Utility supply, installation, and financing of energy products;

Coordination with affected agencies, especially the commission and the office of the Attorney General;

Compliance and enforcement procedures; and

Other program elements required by federal law;

To administer and enforce this chapter and all rules and regulations and orders promulgated hereunder;

To receive and administer any federal funding available for the purposes of this chapter; and

To amend the regulations promulgated under this chapter to conform to any future changes in the federal law and regulations governing the program.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1258, § 4; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1088, § 42/SB 148.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “office of the Attorney General” for “Office of Consumer Affairs” in subparagraph (1)(F).

46-4A-5.
Inspections and investigations by director; enforcement of chapter by director.

The director shall have the authority to investigate the activities of the covered utilities in order to ascertain whether they are in compliance with this chapter and the rules and regulations and orders promulgated hereunder. Such investigations may include routine inspections and inspections arising as a result of information indicating that a violation may have occurred.

The director shall have the authority to take any action authorized by this chapter which he deems necessary to enforce this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1258, § 7.

46-4A-6.
Proceedings before the director.

Whenever the director has reason to believe that a violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter has occurred, he shall attempt to obtain a remedy with the violator or violators by conference, conciliation, or persuasion. When a remedy is obtained through conference, conciliation, or persuasion, such remedy may be set out in a written consent order and signed by both the director and the violator or violators. A written consent order shall be considered a final order.

In the case of failure of such conference, conciliation, or persuasion to effect a remedy to such violation, the director may, after notice and hearing, issue a final order directed to such violator or violators, which order shall specify the provisions of the chapter or rule or regulation which have been violated and shall direct that necessary corrective action as prescribed in such order be taken within a reasonable time.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1258, § 8.

46-4A-7.
Injunctions, restraining orders, and other orders.

Whenever, in the judgment of the director, any covered utility has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice which constitutes or will constitute a violation of this chapter, the director may make application to the superior court wherein the covered utility maintains its principal place of business, or, if a nonresident of the state, to the superior court of the county where such covered utility is engaged in or is about to engage in such act or practice, for an order restraining and enjoining such act or practice; and upon a showing by the director that such covered utility has engaged in or is about to engage in any such act or practice, a temporary or permanent injunction, restraining order, or other order shall be granted without the necessity of showing the lack of an adequate remedy at law.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1258, § 10.

46-4A-8.
Commencement and conducting of hearings in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

All hearings under this chapter shall be commenced and conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1258, § 11.

46-4A-9.
Judicial review.

Any person who has exhausted all administrative remedies available before the director and who is aggrieved by a final order or action in a contested case is entitled to judicial review under this chapter. All proceedings for judicial review shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act”; and any party to the proceeding may secure a review of the final judgment of the superior court by appeal in the manner and form provided by law for appeals from the superior courts to the appellate courts of this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1258, § 12.

46-4A-10.
Duty of Attorney General to represent director in actions.

It shall be the duty of the Attorney General or his representative to represent the director in all actions in connection with this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1258, § 13.

46-4A-11.
Scope of director’s authority to administer chapter relative to federal law.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall authorize the director to establish or maintain the Residential Conservation Service program or otherwise administer this chapter except to the extent necessary to avoid the imposition of a federal program pursuant to the National Energy Conservation Policy Act (P.L. 95-619).

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1258, § 14.

U.S. Code.

The federal National Energy Conservation Policy Act, referred to in this section, is codified principally at

42 U.S.C. § 8201

et seq.

46-4A-12.
Construction of chapter.

No provision of this chapter or any rules or regulations or orders hereunder shall be construed to be a limitation:

On the activities of any privately or publicly owned utility which is not a covered utility;

On the activities of covered utilities, when such activities are not subject to this chapter;

On the activities of contractors, suppliers, or lenders, when such activities are not subject to this chapter;

On the activities of the Division of Energy Resources of the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority in the enforcement or administration of any program or provision of law; and

On the power of any state or local agency in the enforcement or administration of any provision of law it is specifically permitted or required to enforce or administer, including, but not limited to, the Public Service Commission, the office of the Attorney General, and the Construction Industry Licensing Board.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1258, § 5; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1108, § 4; Ga. L. 2010, p. 949, § 1/HB 244; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1088, § 43/SB 148.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “Georgia Environmental Finance Authority” for “Georgia Environmental Facilities Authority” in the middle of paragraph (4).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “office of the Attorney General” for “Office of Consumer Affairs” in paragraph (5).

Cross references.

State Construction Industry Licensing Board generally, Ch. 14, T. 43.

Division of Energy Resources generally, §

50-23-30

et seq.

46-4A-13.
Failure of covered utility to comply with chapter and rules and regulations.

It shall be unlawful for any covered utility to fail to comply with this chapter and the rules and regulations and orders promulgated hereunder.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1258, § 6.

46-4A-14.
Civil penalties; removal of contractor, supplier, or lender from master record.

Any covered utility which intentionally or negligently violates any provision of this chapter or the rules and regulations promulgated hereunder or which fails or refuses to comply with any final order of the director issued as provided in this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000.00 for such violation and an additional civil penalty not to exceed $500.00 for each day such violation continues.

The director, after notice and hearing, shall determine whether or not any covered utility has intentionally or negligently violated any provision of this chapter or has failed or refused to comply with any final order of the director and may, upon a proper finding, issue his order imposing such civil penalties as provided in this Code section. Any covered utility so penalized under this section is entitled to judicial review. All hearings and proceedings for judicial review under this Code section shall be in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” as provided in this chapter. All penalties and interest recovered by the director, as provided in this Code section, together with the cost thereof, shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the general fund.

Any contractor, supplier, or lender who is listed on the master record established by the Division of Energy Resources of the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority and who violates any provision of this chapter or the rules or regulations promulgated hereunder is subject to removal from the applicable master record in accordance with the rules and regulations established pursuant to the Residential Conservation Service program.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1258, § 9; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1108, § 5; Ga. L. 2010, p. 949, § 1/HB 244.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “Georgia Environmental Finance Authority” for “Georgia Environmental Facilities Authority” near the middle of subsection (c).